test/src/gt-desc-yamls/sme-tests_gt-desc.yaml
  Adj - beavkálas: # ISSORAS
    beavkálas+A+Attr: beavkálas
    beavkálas+A+Sg+Nom: beavkálas
    beavkálas+A+Sg+Gen: beavkálasa
    beavkálas+A+Sg+Acc: beavkálas
    beavkálas+A+Sg+Ill: beavkálassii
    beavkálas+A+Sg+Loc: [beavkálasas, beavkálasan]
    beavkálas+A+Pl+Acc: beavkálasaid
    beavkálas+A+Pl+Com: beavkálasaiguin
    beavkálas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [beavkáleabbo, beavkálabbo, beavkálut, beavkálit, beavkálet, beavkálat, beavkáleabbu, beavkálabbu]
    beavkálas+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [beavkáleappuid, beavkálabbuid]
    beavkálas+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [beavkáleamos, beavkálamos, beavkáleamus]
    beavkálas+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: beavkálepmosiin
    beavkálas+A+Der/at+Adv: beavkálasat

  Adj - jiešheanalaš: # DABALAS
    jiešheanalaš+A+Attr: jiešheanalaš
    jiešheanalaš+A+Sg+Nom: jiešheanalaš
    jiešheanalaš+A+Sg+Gen: jiešheanalačča
    jiešheanalaš+A+Sg+Acc: jiešheanalačča
    jiešheanalaš+A+Sg+Ill: jiešheanalažžii
    jiešheanalaš+A+Sg+Loc: [jiešheanalaččas, jiešheanalaččan]
    jiešheanalaš+A+Pl+Acc: jiešheanalaččaid
    jiešheanalaš+A+Pl+Com: jiešheanalaččaiguin
    jiešheanalaš+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [jiešheanaleabbo, jiešheanalabbo, jiešheanalut, jiešheanalit, jiešheanalet, jiešheanalat, jiešheanaleabbu, jiešheanalabbu, jiešheanalaččat]
    jiešheanalaš+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [jiešheanaleappuid, jiešheanalabbuid, jiešheanalaččabuid]
    jiešheanalaš+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [jiešheanaleamos, jiešheanalamos, jiešheanaleamus, jiešheanalaččamus]
    jiešheanalaš+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: [jiešheanalepmosiin, jiešheanalamosiin, jiešheanalaččamusain, jiešheanalaččamusain]
    jiešheanalaš+A+Der/at+Adv: jiešheanalaččat

  Adj - vuordevaš: # DEARVVASLAS
    vuordevaš+A+Attr: vuordevaš
    vuordevaš+A+Sg+Nom: vuordevaš
    vuordevaš+A+Sg+Gen: vuordevačča
    vuordevaš+A+Sg+Acc: vuordevačča
    vuordevaš+A+Sg+Ill: vuordevažžii
    vuordevaš+A+Sg+Loc: [vuordevaččas, vuordevaččan]
    vuordevaš+A+Pl+Acc: vuordevaččaid
    vuordevaš+A+Pl+Com: vuordevaččaiguin
    vuordevaš+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: vuordevaččat
    vuordevaš+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: vuordevaččabuid
    vuordevaš+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: vuordevaččamus
    vuordevaš+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: vuordevaččamusain
    vuordevaš+A+Der/at+Adv: vuordevaččat

  Adj - guoskkatmeahttun: # MEAHTTUS
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Attr: guoskkatmeahttun
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Sg+Nom: guoskkatmeahttun
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Sg+Gen: [guoskkatmeahttun, guoskkatmeahttuma]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Sg+Acc: [guoskkatmeahttun, guoskkatmeahttuma]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Sg+Ill: guoskkatmeahttumii
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Sg+Loc: guoskkatmeahttumis
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Pl+Acc: guoskkatmeahttumiid
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Pl+Com: guoskkatmeahttumiiguin
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [guoskkatmeahttuseabbo, guoskkatmeahttusabbo, guoskkatmeahttusut, guoskkatmeahttusit, guoskkatmeahttuset, guoskkatmeahttusat, guoskkatmeahttuseabbu, guoskkatmeahttusabbu]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [guoskkatmeahttuseappuid, guoskkatmeahttusabbuid]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [guoskkatmeahttuseamos, guoskkatmeahttusamos, guoskkatmeahttuseamus]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: guoskkatmeahttusepmosiin
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Der/at+Adv: [guoskkatmeahttusit, guoskkatmeahttumit]

  Adj - doaibmil: # JOHTIL
    doaibmil+A+Attr: doaibmilis
    doaibmil+A+Sg+Nom: doaibmil
    doaibmil+A+Sg+Gen: [doaibmil, doaibmila]
    doaibmil+A+Sg+Acc: [doaibmil, doaibmila]
    doaibmil+A+Sg+Ill: doaibmilii
    doaibmil+A+Sg+Loc: doaibmilis
    doaibmil+A+Pl+Acc: doaibmiliid
    doaibmil+A+Pl+Com: doaibmiliiguin
    doaibmil+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [doaibmileabbo, doaibmilabbo, doaibmilut, doaibmilit, doaibmilet, doaibmilat, doaibmileabbu, doaibmilabbu]
    doaibmil+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [doaibmileappuid, doaibmilabbuid]
    doaibmil+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [doaibmileamos, doaibmilamos, doaibmileamus]
    doaibmil+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: doaibmilepmosiin
    doaibmil+A+Der/at+Adv: doaibmilit

  Adj - ceaikkas: # GARAS
    ceaikkas+A+Attr: ceaika
    ceaikkas+A+Sg+Nom: ceaikkas
    ceaikkas+A+Sg+Gen: [ceaikas, ceaikasa]
    ceaikkas+A+Sg+Acc: [ceaikas, ceaikasa]
    ceaikkas+A+Sg+Ill: ceaikasii
    ceaikkas+A+Sg+Loc: ceaikasis
    ceaikkas+A+Pl+Acc: ceaikasiid
    ceaikkas+A+Pl+Com: ceaikasiiguin
    ceaikkas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [ceaikaseabbo, ceaikasabbo, ceaikasut, ceaikasit, ceaikaset, ceaikasat, ceaikaseabbu, ceaikasabbu]
    ceaikkas+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [ceaikaseappuid, ceaikasabbuid]
    ceaikkas+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [ceaikaseamos, ceaikasamos, ceaikaseamus]
    ceaikkas+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: ceaikasepmosiin
    ceaikkas+A+Der/at+Adv: ceaikasit

  Adj - boahkis: # BOAKKAS
    boahkis+A+Sg+Nom: boahkis
    boahkis+A+Sg+Gen: [boahkkás, boahkkása]
    boahkis+A+Sg+Acc: [boahkkás, boahkkása]
    boahkis+A+Sg+Ill: boahkkásii
    boahkis+A+Sg+Loc: boahkkásis
    boahkis+A+Pl+Acc: boahkkásiid
    boahkis+A+Pl+Com: boahkkásiiguin
    boahkis+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [boahkkáseabbo, boahkkásabbo, boahkkásut, boahkkásit, boahkkáset, boahkkásat, boahkkáseabbu, boahkkásabbu]
    boahkis+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [boahkkáseappuid, boahkkásabbuid]
    boahkis+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [boahkkáseamos, boahkkásamos, boahkkáseamus]
    boahkis+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: boahkkásepmosiin
    boahkis+A+Der/at+Adv: boahkkásit

  Adj - gearpmus: # GAPPUS
    gearpmus+A+Attr: gearpmus
    gearpmus+A+Sg+Nom: gearpmus
    gearpmus+A+Sg+Gen: [gerbmos, gerbmosa]
    gearpmus+A+Sg+Acc: [gerbmos, gerbmosa]
    gearpmus+A+Sg+Ill: gerbmosii
    gearpmus+A+Sg+Loc: gerbmosis
    gearpmus+A+Pl+Acc: gerbmosiid
    gearpmus+A+Pl+Com: gerbmosiiguin
    gearpmus+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [gerbmoseabbo, gerbmosabbo, gerbmosut, gerbmosit, gerbmoset, gerbmosat, gerbmoseabbu, gerbmosabbu]
    gearpmus+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [gerbmoseappuid, gerbmosabbuid]
    gearpmus+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [gerbmoseamos, gerbmosamos, gerbmoseamus]
    gearpmus+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: gerbmosepmosiin
    gearpmus+A+Der/at+Adv: gerbmosit

  Adj - biktaseaddjái: # JIEDNAI
    biktaseaddjái+A+Attr: biktaseaddjás
    biktaseaddjái+A+Sg+Nom: biktaseaddjái
    biktaseaddjái+A+Sg+Gen: biktaseaddjá
    biktaseaddjái+A+Sg+Acc: biktaseaddjá
    biktaseaddjái+A+Sg+Ill: biktaseaddjái
    biktaseaddjái+A+Sg+Loc: [biktaseaddjás, biktaseaddján]
    biktaseaddjái+A+Pl+Acc: biktaseaddjáid
    biktaseaddjái+A+Pl+Com: biktaseaddjáiguin
    biktaseaddjái+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: biktaseaddját
    biktaseaddjái+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: biktaseaddjábuid
    biktaseaddjái+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: biktaseaddjámus
    biktaseaddjái+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: biktaseaddjámusain
    biktaseaddjái+A+Der/at+Adv: biktaseaddjájit

  Adj - ekspressiiva: # AKTIIVA
    ekspressiiva+A+Attr: ekspressiiva
    ekspressiiva+A+Sg+Nom: ekspressiiva
    ekspressiiva+A+Sg+Gen: ekspressiivva
    ekspressiiva+A+Sg+Acc: ekspressiivva
    ekspressiiva+A+Sg+Ill: ekspressiivii
    ekspressiiva+A+Sg+Loc: [ekspressiivvas, ekspressiivvan]
    ekspressiiva+A+Pl+Acc: ekspressiivvaid
    ekspressiiva+A+Pl+Com: ekspressiivvaiguin
    ekspressiiva+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: ekspressiivvat
    ekspressiiva+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: ekspressiivvabuid
    ekspressiiva+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: ekspressiivvamus
    ekspressiiva+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: ekspressiivvamusain
    ekspressiiva+A+Der/at+Adv: ekspressiivvat

  Adj - guvrelágan: # LAGAN
    guvrelágan+A+Attr:   [guvrelágan, guvrelágán]
    guvrelágan+A+Sg+Nom: [guvrelágan, guvrelágán]
    guvrelágan+A+Sg+Gen: [guvrelágana, guvrelágána, guvrelágan, guvrelágán]
    guvrelágan+A+Sg+Acc: [guvrelágana, guvrelágána, guvrelágán, guvrelágan]
    guvrelágan+A+Sg+Ill: [guvreláganii, guvrelágánii]
    guvrelágan+A+Sg+Loc: [guvreláganis, guvrelágánis, guvreláganin, guvrelágánin]
    guvrelágan+A+Pl+Acc: [guvreláganiid, guvrelágániid]
    guvrelágan+A+Pl+Com: [guvreláganiiguin, guvrelágániiguin]

  Verb - njuozzut: # BORRA_TV
    njuozzut+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuoccun
    njuozzut+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuozzu
    njuozzut+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: njuzzot
    njuozzut+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: njuoccuiga
    njuozzut+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: njuoccuidet
    njuozzut+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: njuzzo
    njuozzut+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: njuocco
    njuozzut+V+TV+Imprt+Pl3: njuzzoset
    njuozzut+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [njuccoleimme, njuccošeimme, njuccoleimme, njuoccušeimme]
    njuozzut+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [njuccolii, njuccošii, njuccolii, njuoccušii]
    njuozzut+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [njuccoš, njuccoža]
    njuozzut+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: njuccožit
    njuozzut+V+TV+Ger: [njuoccudin, njuoccudiin, njuoccudettiin]
    njuozzut+V+TV+PrfPrc: njuzzon
    njuozzut+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: njuzzojuvvot
    njuozzut+V+TV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: njuzzuidet
    njuozzut+V+TV+Der/goahti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: njuozzugohten
    njuozzut+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: njuoccostalaiga
    njuozzut+V+TV+Der/h+V+Der/easti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: njuoccuheasttát
    njuozzut+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: njuozzumis

  Verb - čoallut: # DEAKCU_TV
    čoallut+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čoalun
    čoallut+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čoallu
    čoallut+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čollot
    čoallut+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: čoaluiga
    čoallut+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: čoaluidet
    čoallut+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čollo
    čoallut+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: čoalo
    čoallut+V+TV+Imprt+Pl3: čolloset
    čoallut+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [čololeimme, čološeimme, čololeimme, čoalušeimme]
    čoallut+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [čololii, čološii, čololii, čoalušii]
    čoallut+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [čološ, čoloža]
    čoallut+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: čoložit
    čoallut+V+TV+Ger: [čoaludin, čoaludiin, čoaludettiin]
    čoallut+V+TV+PrfPrc: čollon
    čoallut+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: čollojuvvot
    čoallut+V+TV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: čolluidet
    čoallut+V+TV+Der/goahti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čoallugohten
    čoallut+V+TV+Der/l+V+Der/adda+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [čollolattaiga, čoallulattaiga]
    čoallut+V+TV+Der/h+V+Der/easti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: čoaluheasttát
    čoallut+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: čoallumis

  Verb - addáladdat: # DIEHTALADDA_TV
    addáladdat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: addálattan
    addáladdat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: addáladdá
    addáladdat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: addáladdet
    addáladdat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: addálattaiga
    addáladdat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: addálattaidet
    addáladdat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: addáladde
    addáladdat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: addálatta
    addáladdat+V+TV+Imprt+Pl3: addáladdoset
    addáladdat+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [addálattaleimme, addálattašeimme]
    addáladdat+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [addálattalii, addálattašii]
    addáladdat+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [addálattaš, addálattaža]
    addáladdat+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: addálattažit
    addáladdat+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: addáladdojuvvot
    addáladdat+V+TV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: addáladduidet
    addáladdat+V+TV+Der/goahti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: addáladdagohten
    addáladdat+V+TV+Ger: [addálattadin, addálattadiin, addálattadettiin]
    addáladdat+V+TV+PrfPrc: addáladdan
    addáladdat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: [addáladdamis, addáladdamin]

  Verb - mášohuhttit: # HAHTTIT_TV
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mášohuhtán
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mášohuhttá
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mášohuhttet
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: mášohuhtiiga
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: mášohuhtiidet
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: mášohuhtte
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: mášohuhte
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Imprt+Pl3: mášohuhttoset
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [mášohuhtáleimme, mášohuhtášeimme]
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [mášohuhtálii, mášohuhtášii]
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [mášohuhteš, mášohuhteža]
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: mášohuhtežit
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: mášohuhttojuvvot
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: mášohuhttuidet
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Der/goahti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: mášohuhttigohten
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Ger: [mášohuhtidin, mášohuhtidiin, mášohuhtidettiin]
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+PrfPrc: mášohuhttán
    mášohuhttit+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: mášohuhttimis
